North Carolina, session 2025, HB1066.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REVISE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS AND REDUCE FUNDS FOR THE
OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
SECTION 1.1.(a) G.S. 115C-562.1(3a) reads as rewritten:
"(3a) Eligible student. – A student residing in North Carolina who has not yet
received a high school diploma and who meets all of the following
requirements:
a. Is eligible to attend a North Carolina public school pursuant to Article
25 of this Chapter. A child who is the age of 4 on or before April 16 is
eligible to attend the following school year if the principal, or
equivalent, of the school in which the child seeks to enroll finds that
*H1066-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the student meets the requirements established by the Authority
pursuant to G.S. 115C-562.2(d) and those findings are submitted to the
Authority.
b. Has not been enrolled in a postsecondary institution as a full-time
student taking at least 12 hours of academic credit.
c. Has not been placed in a nonpublic school or facility by a public
agency at public expense.
d. Resides in a household with an income level not in excess of two
hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to
qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch program."
SECTION 1.1.(b) G.S. 115C-562.2 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-562.2. Scholarship grants.
(a) The Authority shall make available no later than February 1 annually applications to
eligible students for the award of scholarship grants to attend any nonpublic school on a full- or
part-time basis. Information about scholarship grants and the application process shall be made
available on the Authority's website. Beginning March 15, the Authority shall begin awarding
scholarship grants to students who have applied by March 1 in the following order:
(1) Eligible students who received a scholarship grant for the school year prior to
the school year for which the students are applying.
(2) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (1) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(3) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (2) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(4) Eligible students qualifying for a scholarship grant in the amount provided
under subdivision (3) of subsection (b2) of this section.
(5) All other students.
…
(b2) Scholarship grants shall be awarded to eligible students as follows:
(1) For students residing in households with an income level not in excess of the
amount required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price
lunch program, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to one hundred
percent (100%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year.
(2) For students residing in households with an income level between the amount
required for the student to qualify for the federal free or reduced-price lunch
program and not in excess of two hundred percent (200%) of that amount, per
year per eligible student, an amount of up to ninety percent (90%) of the
average State per pupil allocation for average daily membership in the prior
fiscal year.
(3) For students residing in households with an income level of between two
hundred percent (200%) of the amount required for the student to qualify for
the federal free or reduced-price lunch program and not in excess of four
hundred fifty percent (450%) of that amount, per year per eligible student, an
amount of up to sixty percent (60%) of the average State per pupil allocation
for average daily membership in the prior fiscal year.
(4) For all students, per year per eligible student, an amount of up to forty-five
percent (45%) of the average State per pupil allocation for average daily
membership in the prior fiscal year, unless the student qualifies for a higher
amount under this subsection.
…."
SECTION 1.1.(c) G.S. 115C-562.8 reads as rewritten:
Page 2 House Bill 1066-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 115C-562.8. The Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve.
…
(b) The General Assembly finds that, due to the critical need in this State to provide
opportunity for school choice for North Carolina students, it is imperative that the State provide
an increase of funds for 15 years to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve. Therefore,
there There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Reserve the following amounts for each
fiscal year to be used for the purposes set forth in this section:
Fiscal Year Appropriation
…
2027-2028 $700,000,000$460,000,000
2028-2029 $725,000,000$485,000,000
2029-2030 $750,000,000$510,000,000
2030-2031 $775,000,000$535,000,000
2031-2032 $800,000,000$560,000,000
For the 2032-2033 fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Reserve the sum of eight hundred twenty-five million dollars ($825,000,000)
five hundred eighty-five million dollars ($585,000,000) to be used for the purposes set forth in
this section. When developing the base budget, as defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for each fiscal year
specified in this subsection, the Director of the Budget shall include the appropriated amount
specified in this subsection for that fiscal year.
…."
SECTION 1.1.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, funds
appropriated to the Opportunity Scholarship Grant Fund Reserve for the award of opportunity
scholarship grants pursuant to Part 2A of Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes are
reduced as follows:
(1) By the sum of one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) in
nonrecurring funds appropriated in the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the award of
scholarship grants in the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
(2) By the sum of two hundred forty million dollars ($240,000,000) in recurring
funds appropriated in the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the award of scholarship
grants in the 2027-2028 fiscal year.
SECTION 1.1.(e) This section becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to
applications for the award of scholarship funds beginning in the 2027-2028 school year.

CHILD CARE SUBSIDY FUNDS FROM REDUCTIONS IN OPPORTUNITY
SCHOLARSHIP FUNDS
SECTION 1.2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year and the sum of two hundred forty million dollars ($240,000,000) in recurring funds
beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, as a result of the reductions made under Section 1.1 of
this Part, to be used to assist in reducing the waitlist for subsidized child care in this State.

PART II. TRI-SHARE CHILD CARE PROGRAM PERMANENCY/FUNDS
SECTION 2.1.(a) Part 10B of Article 3 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-168.17. Tri-Share Child Care Program.
(a) There is established the Tri-Share Child Care Program (Program), a program that
creates a public/private partnership to share the cost of child care equally between employers,
eligible employees, and the State to:
(1) Make high-quality child care affordable and accessible for working families.
House Bill 1066-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Help employers retain and attract employees.
(3) Help stabilize child care businesses across the State.
(b) The North Carolina Partnership, in collaboration with the Department, shall facilitate
the Program. Up to three local partnerships shall serve as regional facilitator hubs to implement
and administer the Program and act as regional intermediaries between employers, families, child
care providers, and the State. Local partnerships serving as regional facilitator hubs shall be
selected from geographically diverse areas across the State, with one selected from a tier one
county. For purposes of this subsection, a tier one county shall have the same designation as that
established by the most current version of the North Carolina Department of Commerce's County
Tier Designations.
(c) The North Carolina Partnership shall be accountable for the programmatic and fiscal
integrity of the Program and services and shall implement standardized procedures to ensure the
Program is operated consistently among all regional facilitator hubs to include, at a minimum,
each of the following:
(1) Design of the Program.
(2) Establishment of the Program infrastructure.
(3) Recruitment of participating child care providers and employers.
(d) The North Carolina Partnership may contract with a third-party administrator to assist
with centralized enrollment, payment processing, and other financial transactions associated with
the Program. The North Carolina Partnership shall conduct financial and compliance monitoring
of the regional facilitator hubs and the third-party administrator, if applicable.
(e) The North Carolina Partnership and local partnerships serving as regional facilitator
hubs shall determine Program eligibility based on standardized criteria. For purposes of this
Program, an employee is eligible to participate in the Program if the employee (i) is employed
by a participating employer, (ii) has a household income between one hundred eighty-five percent
(185%) and three hundred percent (300%) of the federal poverty level, and (iii) is not otherwise
eligible for subsidized child care in this State. An eligible employee may reside outside of the
designated region for the respective facilitator hub. Other criteria the North Carolina Partnership
and regional facilitator hubs shall implement for the Program include, at a minimum, each of the
following:
(1) Ensuring payment for the cost of child care is divided equally between an
employer, an eligible employee, and the State.
(2) Soliciting participating employers.
(3) Ensuring participating employers agree to (i) identify and recruit eligible
employees, (ii) provide the employer portion of each participating employee's
child care costs, and (iii) maintain communication with the regional facilitator
hub regarding each eligible employee's continued employment and eligibility.
(4) Verifying that child care providers seeking to participate in the Program are
licensed in this State.
(5) Upon determining an employee's eligibility, ensuring payment by the
employee of the employee's portion of the cost of child care.
(6) Coordinating payments between employers and licensed child care providers.
(f) For purposes of this section, child care includes part-time and full-time care, before
and after school care, and summer day camps.
(g) The North Carolina Partnership shall collaborate with the Department of Commerce
to prioritize businesses in sectors experiencing persistent labor shortages.
(h) Funds provided for the Program pursuant to this section shall be divided evenly in
each fiscal year among the regional facilitator hubs administering the Program. These funds shall
not revert but shall remain available for costs associated with the Program. A regional facilitator
hub may use up to nine percent (9%) of its allocation for administrative costs.
Page 4 House Bill 1066-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(i) The North Carolina Partnership shall include in its annual report required by
G.S. 143B-168.12(d), at a minimum, each of the following regarding the Program:
(1) The number of children served, by age and county.
(2) The list of employers participating in the Program.
(3) Total Program costs, including any administrative costs."
SECTION 2.1.(b) G.S. 143B-168.12(d) is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(6a) A description of the information required to be reported for the Tri-Share
Child Care Program under G.S. 143B-168.17."
SECTION 2.1.(c) Employees deemed eligible to participate in the Tri-Share Child
Care pilot program pursuant to Section 9D.9 of S.L. 2023-134, as amended by Section 15 of S.L.
2024-34, shall remain eligible to participate in the Tri-Share Child Care Program under
G.S. 143B-168.17, as enacted under subsection (a) of this section, upon enactment of this section.
SECTION 2.1.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, to be
allocated to the North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc. (NCPC), the sum of nine million
dollars ($9,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide the State portion
of funding for continuation of the Tri-Share Child Care Program established in Section 9D.9 of
S.L. 2023-134, as amended by Section 15 of S.L. 2024-34. Funds provided under this section
shall be divided evenly in each fiscal year among the regional facilitator hubs, as described in
G.S. 143B-168.17, enacted in subsection (a) of this section.

PART III. REENACT CHILD CARE TAX CREDIT
SECTION 3.1.(a) G.S. 105-153.10 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
expiration and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.10. Credit for children.
(a) Credit. – A taxpayer who is allowed a federal child tax credit under section 24 of the
Code for the taxable year is allowed a credit against the tax imposed by this Part for each
dependent child for whom the taxpayer is allowed the federal credit. A taxpayer is allowed a
credit against the tax imposed by this Part for each qualifying child of the taxpayer. A "qualifying
child" is defined by section 152(c) of the Code. The amount of credit allowed under this section
for the taxable year is equal to the amount listed in the table below based on the taxpayer's
adjusted gross income, as calculated under the Code:
Filing Status AGI Credit Amount
Married, filing jointly Up to $40,000 $125.00$250.00
Over $40,000
Up to $100,000 $100.00$125.00
Over $100,000 0

Head of Household Up to $32,000 $125.00$250.00
Over $32,000
Up to $80,000 $100.00$125.00
Over $80,000 0

Single Up to $20,000 $125.00$250.00
Over $20,000
Up to $50,000 $100.00$125.00
Over $50,000 0

Married, filing separately Up to $20,000 $125.00$250.00
Over $20,000
House Bill 1066-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Up to $50,000 $100.00$125.00
Over $50,000 0.

(b) Limitations. – A nonresident or part-year resident who claims the credit allowed by
this section shall reduce the amount of the credit by multiplying it by the fraction calculated under
G.S. 105-134.5(b) or (c), as appropriate.The credit allowed under this section may not exceed the
amount of tax imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowed,
except payments of tax made by or on behalf of the taxpayer.G.S. 105-153.4. Married individuals
qualifying for a credit under this section who file separate returns may not collectively claim
more than the maximum credit allowed under a joint return.
(c) Credit Refundable. – If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the amount of tax
imposed by this Part for the taxable year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, the Secretary
must refund the excess to the taxpayer. The refundable excess is governed by the provisions
governing a refund of an overpayment by the taxpayer of the tax imposed in this Part. In
computing the amount of tax against which multiple credits are allowed, nonrefundable credits
are subtracted before refundable credits."
SECTION 3.1.(b) This section is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2026.

PART IV. CHILD CARE WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT

EARLY CHILDHOOD APPRENTICESHIPS
SECTION 4.1.(a) Part 3 of Article 1 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-10.52. Early Childhood Apprenticeship Grant Program.
(a) Program Established; Purpose. – There is established the North Carolina Community
College Early Childhood Apprenticeship Grant Program (Program) to be administered by the
State Board of Community Colleges. The purpose of the Program is to provide additional funds
to community colleges to establish or expand registered apprenticeships in early childhood
education recognized by ApprenticeshipNC. The State Board shall adopt rules for the
disbursement of the grants pursuant to this section.
(b) Program Participation. – Any community college in the State may participate in the
Program by providing notice of intent to participate to the State Board.
(c) Grant Fund Usage. – Grant funds awarded pursuant to this section shall only be used
for the following purposes:
(1) Establish or expand registered apprenticeships recognized by
ApprenticeshipNC in early childhood education.
(2) Provide tuition assistance, wage supplements, and employer support payments
for employers participating in registered apprenticeships recognized by
ApprenticeshipNC in early childhood education.
(3) Align apprenticeship coursework with credential requirements in Chapter 110
of the General Statutes.
(4) Prioritize apprenticeship placements in licensed child care facilities serving
subsidy-eligible children.
(d) Report. – By July 15 of each year, the Community Colleges System Office shall report
to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services on the following:
(1) Enrollment changes in programs involving apprenticeships in early childhood
education compared to the prior year.
(2) Completion rates of apprentices compared to the prior year.
(3) To the extent information is available, workforce retention rates for
apprentices who complete their internship."
Page 6 House Bill 1066-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 4.1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in recurring funds to
implement the provisions of this section.

PART V. STREAMLINED ADMINISTRATIVE SYSTEM FOR CHILD CARE
PROVIDERS

UNIFIED CHILD CARE ADMINISTRATIVE PORTAL
SECTION 5.1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education (DCDEE), shall develop and implement a unified online
portal for child care providers. The portal shall allow child care providers to do each of the
following:
(1) Submit required applications, licensing documentation, and compliance
materials.
(2) Apply for State or federally funded programs related to child care.
(3) Access reporting requirements for child care subsidy programs and workforce
initiatives.
(4) Integrate administrative processes from the following agencies:
a. DCDEE.
b. Department of Public Instruction.
c. North Carolina Partnership for Children, Inc.
d. North Carolina Community Colleges System.
e. Other relevant State or federally administered child care funding
programs.
SECTION 5.1.(b) DCDEE shall submit an implementation report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Information Technology within 18 months from the date this act
becomes effective.

PART VI. FACILITIES FOR CHILD CARE

USE OF PUBLIC FACILITIES FOR CHILD CARE
SECTION 6.1.(a) The Department of Public Instruction, in collaboration with the
Community Colleges System Office, shall develop a plan to use underutilized classrooms or
campus spaces for licensed child care facilities. The plan shall do all of the following:
(1) Identify suitable classrooms or campus spaces for use as licensed child care
facilities.
(2) Prioritize classrooms or campus spaces in counties with limited child care
capacity.
(3) Allow for partnerships with licensed providers or nonprofit operators of child
care.
SECTION 6.1.(b) The Department of Public Instruction shall submit a report
detailing the plan developed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and
Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division no later than December 15, 2027.
SECTION 6.1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Public Instruction the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to develop the plan required by this section.

STATE EMPLOYEE CHILD CARE FACILITIES
House Bill 1066-First Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 6.2.(a) The Department of Administration (DOA) shall inventory
underutilized State-owned buildings suitable for conversion into child care facilities that will
serve State employees. DOA shall develop recommendations for each of the following:
(1) Piloting on-site child care facilities.
(2) Public-private partnerships with licensed providers.
(3) Leasing or licensing space for child care operations.
SECTION 6.2.(b) The Department of Administration shall submit a report of its
findings and any recommendations to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on General
Government within 18 months from the date this act becomes effective.
SECTION 6.2.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Administration the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to develop the recommendations required by this section.

PART VII. REGULATORY CLARITY FOR RELIGIOUS-SPONSORED CHILD CARE

GUIDANCE FOR RELIGIOUS-SPONSORED CHILD CARE FACILITIES
SECTION 7.1.(a) The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Child
Development and Early Education, shall develop and publish a clear, regulatory guidance
document to assist religious-sponsored organizations seeking to provide child care that outlines
each of the following:
(1) Licensing pathways.
(2) Religious exemption eligibility.
(3) Health and safety requirements.
(4) Application procedures, including, but not limited to, steps in applying for
licensure and ways to participate in existing exemptions.
SECTION 7.1.(b) The Division of Child Development and Early Education shall
conduct outreach to faith‑based organizations regarding these guidelines.

PART VIII. CHILD CARE FUNDING STABILIZATION

UPDATES TO CHILD CARE SUBSIDY REIMBURSEMENT RATES
SECTION 8.1.(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, shall increase the child care
subsidy market rates to the seventy-fifth percentile as recommended by the most recent Child
Care Market Rate Study for children in three-, four-, and five-star-rated child care centers and
homes.
SECTION 8.1.(b) Beginning July 1, 2026, provisions of payment rates for child care
providers in counties that have a county rate below the State rate for center-based and
home-based care are as follows:
(1) Except as applicable in subdivision (2) of this subsection, payment rates shall
be set at the seventy-fifth percentile statewide market rate as recommended
by the most recent Child Care Market Rate Study for children birth through 5
years of age for licensed three-, four-, and five-star-rated child care centers
and homes.
(2) If it can be demonstrated that the application of the statewide rate to a county
with fewer than 50 children in each age group is lower than the county market
rate and would inhibit the ability of the county to purchase child care for
low-income children, then the county market rate may be applied.
SECTION 8.1.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
two hundred five million dollars ($205,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year
Page 8 House Bill 1066-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
to implement the market rate increases and to establish a floor for child care subsidy rates as set
forth in subsections (a) and (b) of this section.

AUTOMATIC SUBSIDIZED CHILD CARE RATE ADJUSTMENT
SECTION 8.2. Part 10C of Article 3 of Chapter 143B of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-168.28. Automatic rate adjustment for subsidized child care.
(a) Effective July 1, 2027, the Department shall adjust annually the child care subsidy
reimbursement rates based on one of the following, whichever is greater:
(1) The percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers
(CPI-U), South Region, or any subsequent similar publication, as published
by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, for the preceding 12-month
period.
(2) The percentage change reflected in the most recent North Carolina Child Care
Market Rate Study.
(b) If the Child Care Market Rate Study results in higher reimbursement rates than those
calculated under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, the Department shall implement the higher
rates.
(c) Updated reimbursement rates calculated pursuant to this section shall be implemented
administratively and shall not require further appropriation or legislative approval, subject to the
availability of funds.
(d) The Department shall publish updated reimbursement rate schedules by August 1 of
each year and report the adjustments to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and
Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly."

PART IX. CHILD CARE WORKFORCE COMPENSATION AND BENEFITS

EXPANSION OF THE CHILD CARE WAGE$ PROGRAM
SECTION 9.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education (Division), the
sum of twenty-two million seven hundred thousand dollars ($22,700,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year and the sum of thirty-six million dollars ($36,000,000) for the
2027-2028 fiscal year in recurring funds to expand the Child Care WAGE$ program, which
provides salary supplements for early childhood educators. When developing the base budget, as
defined by G.S. 143C-1-1, for the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the Director of the Budget shall include
the appropriated amount specified in this section for that fiscal year.

CHILD CARE EMPLOYER HEALTH COVERAGE POOL
SECTION 9.2.(a) Article 7 of Chapter 110 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 110-90.3. Child care employer health coverage pool.
(a) Establishment. – The Department of State Treasurer, in consultation with the
Department and the Department of Insurance, shall establish and administer a State-run group
health coverage pool to make health benefit coverage available for purchase by eligible child
care employers on behalf of their employees. The pool shall be operated separately from the State
Health Plan for Teachers and State Employees; provided, however, that the State Treasurer may
use administrative, contracting, actuarial, enrollment, and other operational resources of the State
Health Plan to the extent practicable.
(b) Eligible Employers. – An employer is eligible to participate in the pool if the
employer satisfies all of the following criteria:
House Bill 1066-First Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Holds a valid license issued by the Department to operate a child care facility
or child care program in this State.
(2) Elects to participate in the pool in accordance with rules, policies, or
procedures adopted by the State Treasurer.
(3) Agrees to satisfy the employer premium contribution requirements of this
section and any other participation requirements established by the State
Treasurer.
(c) Eligible Employees. – Employees of participating child care employers who satisfy
eligibility requirements established by the State Treasurer shall be eligible to enroll in coverage
offered through the pool established in this section. The State Treasurer may provide for
dependent coverage on terms established by the State Treasurer.
(d) Employer and Employee Premium Share. – A participating child care employer shall
pay not less than fifty percent (50%) of the premium for employee-only coverage elected through
the pool established under this section. An enrolled employee shall pay the remaining percentage
of the premium for employee-only coverage through payroll withholding or other method
approved by the State Treasurer.
(e) Premium Withholdings Rebate. – Subject to the availability of funds appropriated for
this purpose, the Department shall provide a premium withholdings rebate to each child care
employer participating in the pool under this section in an amount equal to the actual employee
premium withholdings remitted by the employer for employee-only coverage, not to exceed
twenty-five percent (25%) of the applicable premium. A rebate provided under this subsection
shall be used solely to offset the employee share of premium required by subsection (d) of this
section.
(f) Administration. – The State Treasurer may contract with one or more third-party
administrators, carriers, pharmacy benefit managers, or other vendors as necessary to operate the
pool established under this section and may determine benefit design, enrollment periods,
coverage effective dates, and other operational matters necessary to implement this section.
(g) Rulemaking and Standards. – The State Treasurer may adopt rules, policies,
procedures, and participation standards necessary to implement this section, including standards
governing employer entry into and withdrawal from the pool, minimum participation
requirements, verification of premium contributions, and coordination with federal requirements.
(h) Reporting. – No later than March 1, 2027, and annually thereafter for two years, the
State Treasurer, in consultation with the Department, shall report to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services and the Fiscal Research Division on
implementation of the pool established in accordance with this section, including employer
participation, employee enrollment, premium levels, rebate utilization, administrative costs, and
recommendations for statutory changes."
SECTION 9.2.(b) The Department of State Treasurer shall ensure that coverage is
available under the child care employer health coverage pool under G.S. 110-90.3, as enacted by
subsection (a) of this section, no later than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 9.2.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of Health and Human Services the sum of thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) in recurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide the premium withholdings rebate authorized by
G.S. 110-90.3(e), as enacted by subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 9.2.(d) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department
of State Treasurer the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2026-2027 fiscal year for administrative and start-up costs associated with establishing the child
care employer health coverage pool authorized by G.S. 110-90.3, as enacted by subsection (a) of
this section.

PART X. EFFECTIVE DATE
Page 10 House Bill 1066-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 10.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act becomes effective July 1,
2026.
House Bill 1066-First Edition Page 11